Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,278
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that head injuries that occur to motorcyclists and moped operators which could be prevented or lessened by the wearing of helmets are a societal problem and that the financial and emotional costs of such injuries cannot be viewed solely on a personal level. It is the intent of the Legislature to prevent injuries and fatalities which occur due to motorcycle and moped accidents and to prevent the subsequent damage to society which results due to the cost of caring for injured people, the pain and suffering which accompanies such injuries and fatalities, and the loss of productive members of society from such injuries.

Laws 1988, LB 428, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,210;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 374.